Vermont, session 2025-2026, H927.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2 V.S.A. § 601(a) is amended to read:
(a) There is created a the Joint Carbon Emissions Reduction Committee
whose membership shall be appointed each biennial session of the General
Assembly. The Committee shall consist of five Representatives not all from
the same political party, at least one from the Committees on Appropriations,
on Commerce and Economic Development, on Energy and Digital
Infrastructure, on Environment, and on Transportation, to be appointed by the
Speaker of the House, and five members of the Senate not all from the same
political party, at least one from the Committees on Appropriations, on
Finance, on Natural Resources and Energy, and on Transportation, to be
appointed by the Committee on Committees.
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 14 is amended to read:
§ 14. FEDERAL HIGHWAY SAFETY ACT; POWERS OF GOVERNOR
AND POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
* * *
(b) The Governor shall provide for the receipt, allocation, and disbursement
of federal monies received pursuant to this section, in accordance with such
State and federal laws and, regulations, and rules as may be applicable.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 2 of 103
2026
(c) Towns, cities, emergency medical services districts, municipalities, and
other political subdivisions are authorized to administer local highway safety
programs approved by the Governor as part of the State’s Highway Safety
Program, and to receive funds available for the foregoing purposes subject to
applicable laws and, regulations, and rules and the approval of the Governor.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 18 is amended to read:
§ 18. SPOUSE ABUSE PROGRAMS; ELIGIBILITY
* * *
(e) Duties and functions of the Center.
(1) The Center shall adopt rules under chapter 25 of this title pursuant to
which interested local programs may apply for funding. Any local agency or
organization may apply to participate.
(2) The Center shall establish minimum standards for eligibility for
State funds awarded through the provisions of this section.
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 21 is amended to read:
§ 21. SEXUAL ASSAULT VICTIMS PROGRAM
* * *
(e) Duties and functions of the Center.
(1) The Center shall adopt rules under chapter 25 of this title pursuant to
which interested local programs may apply for funding. Any local agency or
organization may apply to participate.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 3 of 103
2026
(2) The Center shall establish minimum standards for eligibility for
State funds awarded through the provisions of this section.
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 330 is amended to read:
§ 330. VERMONT INTERNSHIP PROGRAM
(a) Program creation. A The Vermont Internship Program is created:
* * *
(f) Rights of Vermont Internship Program members.
* * *
(5) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in sections 455 et seq.
chapter 16 of this title, upon completion of a State employment commitment
described in subdivision (2) of this subsection, such employee shall receive
State employment retirement credit for all Vermont Internship Program time.
* * *
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 123 is amended to read:
§ 123. DUTIES OF OFFICE
(a) The Office shall provide administrative, secretarial, financial,
investigatory, inspection, and legal services to the boards. The services
provided by the Office shall include:
* * *
(9) Standardizing, to the extent feasible and with the advice of the
boards, all applications, licenses, and other related forms and procedures, and
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 4 of 103
2026
adopting uniform procedural rules governing the investigatory and disciplinary
process for all boards set forth in section 122 of this chapter subchapter.
* * *
(g)(1) The Office shall establish uniform procedures applicable to all of the
professions and boards set forth in section 122 of this chapter subchapter,
providing for:
* * *
Sec. 7. 3 V.S.A. § 343 is amended to read:
§ 343. PRIVATIZATION CONTRACTS; PROCEDURE
* * *
(c)(1) Before an agency may renew a privatization contract for the first
time, the Auditor of Accounts shall review the privatization contract analyzing
whether it is achieving:
(A) the 10 percent cost-savings requirement set forth in subdivision
(a)(2) of this section; and
(B) the performance measures incorporated into the contract as
required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(2) If the Auditor of Accounts finds that a privatization contract has not
achieved the cost savings required under subdivision (a)(2) of this section or
complied with performance measures required under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section, the Auditor of Accounts shall file a report with the agency and, the
House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs, and the
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 5 of 103
2026
Senate Committees Committee on Government Operations, and the agency
shall review whether to renew the privatization contract or perform the work
with State employees.
Sec. 8. 3 V.S.A. § 459 is amended to read:
§ 459. NORMAL AND EARLY RETIREMENT
(a) Normal retirement.
* * *
(3) Application submission. Where application for a retirement
allowance is required, the member shall apply in writing to the Retirement
Board not later than 90 days, or longer for cause shown, after the date upon
which the retirement allowance is to begin.
* * *
(b) Normal retirement allowance.
(1) Upon normal retirement, a Group A member shall receive a normal
retirement allowance that shall be equal to 50 percent of the member’s average
final compensation; provided, however, that if the member has not completed
30 years of creditable service at retirement, or, if earlier, the date of attainment
of such age as may be applicable under the provisions of subdivision (a)(4) of
this section, the member’s allowance shall be multiplied by the ratio that the
number of the member’s years of creditable service at retirement, or such
earlier date, bears to 30.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 6 of 103
2026
(2)(A) Upon normal retirement, a Group C member shall receive a
normal retirement allowance that shall be equal to 50 percent of the member’s
average final compensation; provided, however, that if the member has not
completed 20 years of creditable service at retirement, or, if earlier, the date of
attainment of such age as may be applicable under the provisions of
subdivision (a)(4) of this section, the member’s allowance shall be multiplied
by the ratio that the number of the member’s years of creditable service at
retirement, or such earlier date, bears to 20.
* * *
(5)(A) Until January 1, 1995, upon normal retirement, a Group F
member shall receive a normal retirement allowance that shall be equal to 1¼
one and one-fourth of a percent of his or her the member’s average final
compensation times years of creditable service. On and after January 1, 1995,
upon normal retirement, a Group F member shall receive a normal retirement
allowance equal to 1¼ one and one-fourth of a percent of the member’s
average final compensation times years of membership service prior to January
1, 1991, plus a pension that when added to an annuity shall be equal to 1⅔ one
and two-thirds of a percent of the member’s average final compensation times
years of membership service on and after January 1, 1991. The maximum
retirement allowance shall be 50 percent of average final compensation.
(B) A Group F member first included in the membership of the
system on or after July 1, 2008, upon normal retirement, shall receive a normal
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 7 of 103
2026
retirement allowance equal to 1⅔ one and two-thirds of a percent of the
member’s average final compensation times years of membership service. The
maximum retirement allowance shall be 60 percent of average final
compensation.
* * *
(d) Early retirement allowance.
* * *
(4)(A) Upon early retirement, a Group G member who was previously a
Group F member first included in the membership of the System on or before
June 30, 2008, and who elected to transfer into Group G pursuant to the terms
set by the Board, shall receive an early retirement allowance that shall be equal
to the normal retirement allowance reduced by the lesser of (i) one-half of one
percent for each month equal to the difference between the 240 months and the
member’s months of creditable service, or (ii) an amount that shall be the
actuarial equivalent of the normal retirement allowance computed under
subsection (b) of this section.
(B) Upon early retirement, a Group G member who was previously a
Group F member first included in the membership of the System on or after
July 1, 2008, and who elected to transfer into Group G pursuant to the terms
set by the Board, shall receive an early retirement allowance that shall be equal
to the normal retirement allowance reduced by the lesser of five-ninths of one
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 8 of 103
2026
percent for each month equal to the difference between the 240 months and the
member’s months of creditable service; or.
(C) Upon early retirement, all Group G members other than those
specified in subdivision subdivisions (A) and (B) of this subdivision (d)(4)
shall receive an early retirement allowance that shall be equal to the normal
retirement allowance reduced by an amount that shall be the actuarial
equivalent of the normal retirement allowance computed under subsection (b)
of this section.
* * *
Sec. 9. 3 V.S.A. § 468 is amended to read:
§ 468. OPTIONAL BENEFITS
(a) Until the first payment on account of a retirement allowance becomes
normally due, any member may elect to convert the retirement allowance
otherwise payable to the member after retirement into a retirement allowance
that is its actuarial equivalent, in accordance with one of the optional forms
described in this section.
(1) Option 1. A reduced retirement allowance payable during the
member’s life, with the provision that at the member’s death a lump sum equal
in amount to the difference between the member’s accumulated contributions
at the time of retirement and the sum of the annuity payments actually made to
the member during his or her the member’s lifetime shall be paid to such
person, if any, as the member has nominated by written designation duly
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 9 of 103
2026
acknowledged and filed with the Retirement Board; or, in the absence of a
written designation of beneficiary or when the designated beneficiary is
deceased, the residual amount payable as a result of the death of the member
after retirement shall be payable as follows:
(2)(A) In the case of an open estate, to the administrator or executor.
(B) In the case of a closed estate and the deceased member’s account
is valued at less than $1,000.00, in accordance with the Probate Division of the
Superior Court decree of distribution.
(C) In the absence of an open estate or Probate Division of the
Superior Court decree of distribution, and the deceased member’s account is
valued at less than $1,000.00, to the surviving spouse of the deceased owner,
or, if there is no surviving spouse, then to the next of kin according to
14 V.S.A. § 551 314.
(D) In all other cases, a probate estate shall be opened by the
claimant, or other interested party, in order to determine the appropriate
distribution of the proceeds of the deceased member’s account. When an
estate is opened solely to distribute the proceeds of a deceased member’s
account under this section, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may
waive any filing fees.
(2) [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 10 of 103
2026
(b) Any member who elects to receive a retirement allowance under the
provisions of option 3 or 4 may elect to receive a benefit further reduced
actuarially as prescribed by the Board with the added provision that on the
basis of stipulations contained in a plan-approved domestic relations order or if
the retired member survives the member’s nominated beneficiary, the
retirement allowance that would have been payable during the member’s life
computed pursuant to section 459, 460, or 461 of this title, whichever is
applicable, shall be paid to the retired member during the remainder of the
member’s lifetime. If a member does not make an election as to the form of
his or her the member’s retirement allowance, the member shall receive his or
her the member’s retirement allowance computed pursuant to section 459, 460,
or 461 of this title, whichever is applicable.
Sec. 10. 3 V.S.A. § 531 is amended to read:
§ 531. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3) “Covered employer” means a person, entity, or subsidiary engaged
in a business, industry, profession, trade, or other enterprise in the State,
whether for profit or not for profit, that does not currently offer to an
employee, or is within a control group that maintains or contributes to, a
specified tax-favored retirement plan. If an employer does not maintain a
specified tax-favored retirement plan for a portion of a calendar year ending on
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 11 of 103
2026
in or after the effective date of this chapter 2023 but does adopt such a plan for
the remainder of that calendar year, the employer is not a covered employer for
the remainder of the that year. A covered employer does not include:
(A) the federal government, the State or any other state, any county
or municipal corporation, or any of the State’s or any other state’s units or
instrumentalities; or
(B) any employer that has only been in business during the current
calendar year.
* * *
Sec. 11. 3 V.S.A. § 533 is amended to read:
§ 533. DUTIES OF THE STATE TREASURER
In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the Treasurer:
* * *
(7) Shall evaluate the need for, and procure if necessary, insurance
against any loss in connection with the property, assets, or activities of the
Program as well as establish procedures for abandoned accounts pursuant to
27 V.S.A. chapter 13 18.
* * *
(10) Discharge Shall discharge the Treasurer’s duties as fiduciary with
respect to the Program solely in the interest of the Participants as follows: for
the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to Participants and defraying
reasonable expenses of administering the Program and with the care, skill,
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 12 of 103
2026
prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent
person acting in a like capacity and familiar with those matters would use in
the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims.
Sec. 12. 3 V.S.A. chapter 19 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 19. SOCIAL SECURITY FOR STATE AND MUNICIPAL
EMPLOYEES
* * *
§ 572. DEFINITIONS
For the purposes of this chapter:
* * *
(2) “Employment” means any service performed by any employee in the
employ of the State, or any political subdivision thereof, for such employer,
except:
(1)(A) service Service that in the absence of an agreement entered into
under this chapter would constitute “employment” as defined in the Social
Security Act; or.
(2)(B) service Service that under the Social Security Act may not be
included in an agreement between the State and the Secretary of Health and
Human Services entered into under this chapter. Service that under the Social
Security Act may be included in an agreement only upon certification by the
Governor in accordance with Section 218(d)(3) or 218(d)(7) of that Act shall
be included in the term “employment” if and when the Governor issues, with
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 13 of 103
2026
respect to such service, a certificate to the Secretary of Health and Human
Services pursuant to subsection 578(b) of this title.
* * *
(5) “Secretary of Health and Human Services” includes any individual
to whom the Secretary of Health and Human Services has delegated any of his
or her the Secretary’s functions under the Social Security Act with respect to
coverage under such act Act of employees of states and their political
subdivisions, and with respect to any action taken prior to April 11, 1953,
includes the Federal Security Administrator and any individual to whom such
Administrator had delegated any such function.
* * *
§ 573. FEDERAL-STATE AGREEMENT; INTERSTATE
INSTRUMENTALITIES
(a) The State agency, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby
authorized to enter on behalf of the State into an agreement with the Secretary
of Health and Human Services, consistent with the terms and provisions of this
chapter, for the purpose of extending the benefits of the federal Old Age and
Survivors Insurance System to employees of the State or any political
subdivision thereof with respect to services specified in such agreement that
constitute “employment” as defined in section 572 of this title. Such
agreement may contain such provisions relating to coverage, benefits,
contributions, effective date, modification, and termination of the agreement,
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 14 of 103
2026
administration, and other appropriate provisions as the State agency and
Secretary of Health and Human Services shall agree upon, but, except as may
be otherwise required by or under the Social Security Act as to the services to
be covered, such agreement shall provide in effect that:
* * *
(5) All services that (A) constitute employment as defined in section 572
of this title; (B), are performed in the employ of a political subdivision of the
State;, and (C) are covered by a plan that is in conformity with the terms of the
agreement and has been approved by the State agency under section 575 of this
title, shall be covered by the agreement;
(6) As modified, the agreement shall include all services described in
either subdivision (4) or subdivision (5) of this subsection and performed by
individuals to whom Section 218(c)(3)(C) of the Social Security Act is
applicable, and shall provide that the service of any such individual shall not
continue to be covered by the agreement in case he or she the individual
thereafter becomes eligible to be a member of a Retirement System except as
provided by subdivision (7) hereof of this subsection; and
* * *
(b)(1) Any instrumentality jointly created by this State and any other state
or states is hereby authorized, upon the granting of like authority by such other
state or states,:
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 15 of 103
2026
(1)(A) to enter an agreement with the Secretary of Health and Human
Services whereby the benefits of the federal Old Age and Survivors Insurance
System shall be extended to employees of such instrumentality;
(2)(B) to require its employees to pay (,and for that purpose to deduct
from their wages), contributions equal to the amounts that they would be
required to pay under subsection 574(a) of this title if they were covered by an
agreement made pursuant to subsection (a) of this section; and
(3)(C) to make payments to the Secretary of the Treasury in accordance
with such agreement, including payments from its own funds, and otherwise to
comply with such agreements.
(2) Such agreement shall, to the extent practicable, be consistent with
the terms and provisions of subsection (a) of this section and other provisions
of this chapter.
§ 574. CONTRIBUTIONS BY STATE EMPLOYEES
(a) Every employee of the State whose services are covered by an
agreement entered into under section 573 of this title shall be required to pay
for the period of such coverage, into the Contribution Fund established by
section 576 of this title, contributions, with respect to wages as defined in
section 572 of this title, equal to the amount of the employee tax that would be
imposed by the federal Insurance Contributions Act if such services constituted
employment within the meaning of that Act. Such liability shall arise in
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 16 of 103
2026
consideration of the employee’s retention in the service of the State, or his or
her the employee’s entry upon such service, after April 26, 1951.
* * *
§ 575. PLANS FOR COVERAGE OF EMPLOYEES OF POLITICAL
SUBDIVISIONS
* * *
(c)(1) Each political subdivision as to which a plan has been approved
under this section is authorized to and shall pay into the Contribution Fund,
with respect to wages, at such time or times as the State agency may by rule
prescribe, contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified in the
applicable agreement entered into by the State agency under section 573 of this
title.
(2) Each political subdivision required to make payments under
subdivision (1) of this subsection is authorized, in consideration of the
employee’s retention in, or entry upon, employment after April 26, 1951, to
impose upon each of its employees, as to services that are covered by an
approved plan, a contribution with respect to his or her the employee’s wages
as defined in section 572 of this title, not exceeding the amount of the
employee tax that would be imposed by the federal Insurance Contributions
Act if such services constituted employment within the meaning of that Act,
and to deduct the amount of such contribution from his or her the employee’s
wages as and when paid. Contributions so collected shall be paid into the
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 17 of 103
2026
Contribution Fund in partial discharge of the liability of such political
subdivision or instrumentality under subdivision (1) of this subsection. Failure
to deduct such contribution shall not relieve the employee or employer of
liability therefor.
* * *
§ 576. CONTRIBUTION FUND
(a) There is hereby established a special fund to be known as the
Contribution Fund.
(b) Such The Fund shall consist of and there shall be deposited in such the
Fund:
(1) all contributions, interest, and penalties collected under sections 574
and 575 of this title;
(2) all monies appropriated thereto under this chapter;
(3) any property or securities and earnings thereof acquired through the
use of monies belonging to the Fund;
(4) interest earned upon any monies in the Fund; and
(5) all sums recovered upon the bond of the custodian or otherwise for
losses sustained by the Fund and all other monies received for the Fund from
any other source.
(c) All monies in the Fund shall be mingled and undivided. Subject to the
provisions of this chapter, the State agency is vested with full power, authority,
and jurisdiction over the Fund, including all monies and property or securities
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 18 of 103
2026
belonging thereto, and may perform any and all acts, whether or not
specifically designated, that are necessary to the administration thereof and are
consistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(b)(d) The Contribution Fund shall be established and held separate and
apart from any other funds or monies of the State and shall be used and
administered exclusively for the purpose of this chapter. Withdrawals from
such the Fund shall be made for, and solely for:
(1) payment of amounts required to be paid to the Secretary of the
Treasury pursuant to an agreement entered into under section 573 of this title;
(2) payment of refunds provided for in subsection 574(c) of this title;
and
(3) refunds of overpayments, not otherwise adjustable, made by a
political subdivision or instrumentality.
(c)(e) From the Contribution Fund the custodian of the Fund shall pay to
the Secretary of the Treasury such amounts and at such time or times as is
provided under the terms of the agreement entered into under section 573 of
this title and the Social Security Act.
(d)(f) The Treasurer of the State Treasurer shall be ex officio treasurer and
custodian of the Contribution Fund and shall administer such fund in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The State Treasurer may
appoint a director and other assistants as he or she the Treasurer may deem
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 19 of 103
2026
necessary to administer this chapter and fix their salaries, under the provisions
of section 310 of this title, with the approval of the Governor.
(e)(g) There are hereby authorized to be appropriated annually to the
Contribution Fund, in addition to the contributions collected and paid into the
Contribution Fund under sections 574 and 575 of this title, to be available for
the purposes of subsections (b)(d) and (c)(e) of this section until expended,
such additional sums as are found to be necessary in order to make the
payments to the Secretary of the Treasury that the State is obligated to make
pursuant to an agreement entered into under section 573 of this title.
* * *
§ 578. REFERENDA AND CERTIFICATION
(a) The Governor is empowered to authorize a referendum in accordance
with the requirements of Section 218(d)(3) of the Social Security Act or to
authorize a vote to be held according to Section 218(d)(6)(C) and Section
218(d)(7) of the Social Security Act on the question of whether service in
positions covered by a retirement system established by the State or by a
political subdivision thereof should be excluded from or included under an
agreement under this chapter, and to designate an agency or individual to
supervise the conduct of such referendum or vote. Where a vote is held
according to Sections 218(d)(6)(C) and 218(d)(7) of the Social Security Act,
the Retirement System shall be divided into two parts. One part, Part A, shall
be composed of the positions of members who in such vote have expressed a
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 20 of 103
2026
desire to have their services in such positions included under the agreement
and of the positions of all individuals who become members of such System
after the agreement is extended to include the service of those members who
have expressed a desire to be covered under the Social Security Act, and the.
The other part, Part B, shall be composed of the positions of members who
have not expressed a desire in such vote to have their services included under
the agreement and the positions of any individual who was ineligible to be a
member of such retirement system on August 1, 1956, or, if later, on the day he
or she the individual first occupied such position. The notice of referendum
required by Section 218(d)(3)(C) of the Social Security Act or the notice of the
vote required by Section 218(d)(7)(B) of the Social Security Act shall contain
or shall be accompanied by a statement, in such form and such detail as the
agency or individual designated to supervise the conduct of the referendum or
the vote shall deem necessary and sufficient to inform individuals to whom
such notice is given of the rights that will accrue to them and their dependents
and survivors, and the liabilities to which they will be subject, if their services
are included under an agreement under this chapter.
(b) Upon receiving evidence satisfactory to him or her the Governor that
with respect to any such referendum or any such vote the conditions specified
in Section 218(d)(3) or in Section 218(d)(7), respectively, of the Social
Security Act have been met, the Governor shall so certify to the Secretary of
Health and Human Services.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 21 of 103
2026
* * *
§ 579. WARRANT FOR STATE’S SHARE OF CONTRIBUTION
(a) Employees not members of a retirement system. The Commissioner of
Finance and Management is hereby directed to issue his or her a warrant in
favor of the Vermont State Treasurer, agent, for the amounts necessary to pay
the State’s share of the contribution due the federal government as the result of
such agreement being made applicable to the services of employees of the
State who are not members of a State retirement system. The contribution of
the State to cover members whose salaries are paid from other than the General
Fund appropriation shall be paid from the department appropriation from
which such members’ salaries are paid. It is further directed that after July 1,
1957, these amounts be charged back to the individual departmental
appropriations.
(b) Members of Vermont Employees’ Retirement System. The
Commissioner of Finance and Management is hereby directed to issue his or
her a warrant in favor of the Vermont State Treasurer, agent, for the amounts
necessary to pay the employer’s share of the old age and survivors insurance
tax due the federal government as the result of the coverage agreement
authorized by this chapter being extended to employees of the State who are
members of the Vermont Employees’ Retirement System. It is further directed
that after July 1, 1957, this tax be charged back to the individual departmental
appropriations.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 22 of 103
2026
(c) Members of Vermont State Retirement System. The Commissioner of
Finance and Management is hereby directed to issue his or her a warrant in
favor of the Vermont State Treasurer, agent, for the amounts necessary to pay
the employer’s share of the old age and survivors insurance tax due the federal
government as the result of the coverage agreement authorized by this chapter
being extended to employees of the State who are members of the Vermont
State Retirement System and who were not subject to the provisions of
subsection (b) of this section as in effect on June 30, 1972. It is further
directed that after July 1, 1972, this tax be charged back to the individual
departmental appropriations.
Sec. 13. 3 V.S.A. § 941 is amended to read:
§ 941. UNIT DETERMINATION, CERTIFICATION, AND
REPRESENTATION
* * *
(e)(1) Whenever, on the basis of a petition pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) of
this section or a hearing pursuant to subdivision (d)(2) of this section, the
Board finds substantial interest among employees in forming a bargaining unit
or being represented for purposes of collective bargaining, a secret ballot
election shall be conducted by the Board not more than 23 business days after
the petition is filed with the Board except as otherwise provided pursuant to
subdivision (4) of this subsection and subdivision (g)(4) of this section.
* * *
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 23 of 103
2026
(3)(A) The employer shall file with the Board and the other parties a list
of the employees in the bargaining unit within two business days after the
Board determines that a secret ballot election shall be conducted.
* * *
(D) The list shall be:
(i) kept confidential by the Board and all of the parties; and
(ii) shall be exempt from copying and inspection under the Public
Records Act.
* * *
Sec. 14. 3 V.S.A. § 2222 is amended to read:
§ 2222. POWERS AND DUTIES; BUDGET AND REPORT
(a) In addition to the duties expressly set forth elsewhere by law, the
Secretary shall:
* * *
(2) With the approval of the Governor, issue general policy statements
and general rules and regulations applicable to the Executive Branch of the
State government to implement executive orders or legislative mandate.
* * *
(5) Have access to and the right to inspect all lands, buildings, and
installations owned or leased by the State, under such regulations rules as the
Governor may approve.
* * *
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 24 of 103
2026
Sec. 15. 3 V.S.A. § 2253 is amended to read:
§ 2253. PERMISSIVE DUTIES; APPROVAL OF SECRETARY
Each commissioner may, with the approval of the Secretary:
(1) Transfer classified positions within or between divisions subject only
to State laws and regulations rules.
* * *
Sec. 16. 3 V.S.A. § 2453 is amended to read:
§ 2453. PERMISSIVE DUTIES; APPROVAL OF SECRETARY
* * *
(9) Organize, reorganize, transfer, or abolish divisions, and staff
function sections within the department. This authority shall not extend to
divisions or other bodies created by law.
Sec. 17. 3 V.S.A. § 2511 is amended to read:
§ 2511. DEFINITIONS
* * *
(4) “Qualified period” means a period of five years after the initial grant
of a benefit or a time period set forth in any agreement executed by the State
subsequent to the effective date of this subchapter July 1, 1994.
Sec. 18. 3 V.S.A. § 2516 is amended to read:
§ 2516. CONTRACT PROVISIONS
All contracts or grant awards conferring benefits to businesses after the
effective date of this subchapter July 1, 1994, shall contain a provision
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 25 of 103
2026
notifying the business of the recapture provisions provided in this section and
the qualified period for that business under that contract.
Sec. 19. 3 V.S.A. § 2822(i) is amended to read:
(i) The Secretary shall not process an application for which the applicable
fee has not been paid unless the Secretary specifies that the fee may be paid at
a different time or unless the person applying for the permit is exempt from the
permit fee requirements pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 710. Municipalities shall be
exempt from the payment of fees under this section except for those fees
prescribed in subdivisions (j)(1), (7), (8), (14), and (15) of this section for
which a municipality may recover its costs by charging a user fee to those who
use the permitted services. Municipalities shall pay fees prescribed in
subdivisions (j)(2), (10), (11), (12), and (26), except that a municipality shall
also be exempt from those fees for stormwater systems prescribed in
subdivisions (j)(2)(A)(iii)(I), (II), or (IV) and (j)(2)(B)(iv)(I), (II), or (V) of this
section for which a municipality has assumed full legal responsibility under
10 V.S.A. § 1264.
Sec. 20. 3 V.S.A. § 2854(a) is amended to read:
(a) A director shall administer each division within the Agency. The
commissioners, with the approval of the Secretary, shall appoint the directors
for divisions that are part of a department, and the Secretary shall appoint any
other directors. All directors shall be appointed subject to the provisions of
section 15 of this act requirements of chapter 13 of this title.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 26 of 103
2026
Sec. 21. 3 V.S.A. § 3002 is amended to read:
§ 3002. CREATION OF AGENCY
* * *
(c) Units attached to the Agency for administrative support shall receive,
and shall use, the services provided by the Administrative Services Operations
Division of the Agency under section 3086 of this title.
Sec. 22. 3 V.S.A. § 3053 is amended to read:
§ 3053. PERMISSIVE DUTIES; APPROVAL OF SECRETARY
The commissioner may, with the approval of the Secretary:
* * *
(2) Transfer classified positions within or between divisions subject only
to State personnel laws and regulations rules.
* * *
(5) Make regulations rules consistent with law for the internal
administration of the department and its programs.
* * *
Sec. 23. 3 V.S.A. § 3054(a) is amended to read:
(a) A director shall administer each division within the Agency. The
commissioners, with the approval of the Secretary, shall appoint the directors
for divisions that are part of a department, and the Secretary shall appoint any
other directors. All directors shall be appointed subject to the provisions of
section 14 of this act.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 27 of 103
2026
Sec. 24. 3 V.S.A. § 5022 is amended to read:
§ 5022. DIVISION OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
* * *
(b) Powers and duties. The Division shall review artificial intelligence
systems developed, employed, or procured in State government, including the
following:
* * *
(2) make recommendations to the General Assembly on policies, laws,
and regulations rules for artificial intelligence systems in State government;
and
* * *
Sec. 25. 3 V.S.A. § 6006 is amended to read:
§ 6006. ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE ADVISORY COUNCIL AND
INTERAGENCY ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE COMMITTEE
(a) Advisory Council and Interagency Committee.
(1) There is created:
(A) the Environmental Justice Advisory Council (Advisory Council)
to provide independent advice and recommendations to State agencies and the
General Assembly on matters relating to environmental justice, including the
integration of environmental justice principles into State programs, policies,
regulations rules, legislation, and activities; and
* * *
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 28 of 103
2026
(c) Duties.
* * *
(3) The Advisory Council and the Interagency Committee shall jointly:
* * *
(B) examine existing data and studies on environmental justice and
consult with State, federal, and local agencies and affected communities
regarding the impact of current statutes, regulations rules, and policies on the
achievement of environmental justice.
* * *
Sec. 26. 4 V.S.A. § 1102 is amended to read:
§ 1102. JUDICIAL BUREAU; JURISDICTION
* * *
(b) The Judicial Bureau shall have jurisdiction of the following matters:
* * *
(9) Violations of 7 V.S.A. § 656, relating to illegal possession of
alcoholic beverages and cannabis.
* * *
Sec. 27. 5 V.S.A. § 202 is amended to read:
§ 202. DEFINITIONS
As used in this part of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
* * *
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 29 of 103
2026
(2) “Aeronautics instructor” means an individual engaged in giving
instruction, or offering to give instruction, in aeronautics, either in flying or
ground subjects, or both, for hire or reward, without advertising his or her the
individual’s occupation; without calling his or her the individual’s facilities an
“air school” or anything equivalent; and without employing or using other
instructors. But it “Aeronautics instructor” does not include an instructor in a
public school or university of this State, or an institution of higher learning
accredited and approved for carrying on collegiate work, while engaged in his
or her the instructor’s duties as instructor.
* * *
(26) “Structure” means any object constructed or installed by man a
person, including buildings, towers, smokestacks, and overhead transmission
lines.
Sec. 28. 6 V.S.A. § 4871(g) is amended to read:
(g) Identification; ranking of water quality needs.
(1) Identification; ranking of water quality needs. During an inspection
of a small farm under this section, the Secretary shall identify areas where the
farm could benefit from capital, structural, or technical assistance in order to
improve or come into compliance with the Required Agricultural Practices and
any applicable State water quality permit or certification required under this
chapter.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 30 of 103
2026
(2) Notwithstanding the priority system established under section 4823
of this title, the Secretary annually shall establish a priority ranking system for
small farms according to the water quality benefit associated with the capital,
structural, or technical improvements identified as needed by the Secretary
during an inspection of the farm.
(3) Notwithstanding the priority system established by subdivision (2) of
this subsection, the Secretary may provide financial assistance to a small farm
at any time, regardless of the priority ranking system, if the Secretary
determines that the farm needs assistance to address a water quality issue that
requires immediate abatement.
Sec. 29. 7 V.S.A. § 656 is amended to read:
§ 656. PERSON 12 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AND UNDER 21 YEARS
OF AGE MISREPRESENTING AGE, PROCURING, POSSESSING,
OR CONSUMING ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; IMPAIRED
DRIVING; POSSESSION OF CANNABIS; CIVIL VIOLATION
* * *
(b) Prohibited conduct; offenses.
* * *
(3) Impaired driver penalties.
* * *
(C) During a suspension issued pursuant to subdivision (A) or (B) of
this subdivision (3), a person may operate a motor vehicle if issued an ignition
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 31 of 103
2026
interlock restricted driver’s license or certificate in accordance with 23 V.S.A.
§ 1213.
* * *
(ii) A person subject to penalties under subdivision (A)(i)(A)(ii) of
this subdivision (b)(3) and who elects to operate a motor vehicle with an
ignition interlock RDL or certificate shall be reinstated only if the person
operates with an ignition interlock RDL or certificate for a period of one year
or until the person reaches 21 years of age, whichever is longer, in addition to
any extension of this period arising from a violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1213.
* * *
Sec. 30. 8 V.S.A. § 3461 is amended to read:
§ 3461. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(13) “Equity interest” means any of the following that are not rated
credit instruments:
* * *
(K) instruments that would be rated credit instruments except for the
provisions of subdivision (39)(B)(38)(B) of this section.
* * *
Sec. 31. 8 V.S.A. § 4064(b) is amended to read:
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 32 of 103
2026
* * *
Sec. 32. 8 V.S.A. § 4071(c) is amended to read:
(c) Cost sharing. A health insurance plan shall not impose greater
coinsurance, co-payment, deductible, or other cost-sharing requirements for
coverage of gender-affirming health care services than apply to the diagnosis
and treatment of any other physical or mental condition under the plan.
Sec. 33. 8 V.S.A. § 4072 is amended to read:
§ 4072. MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER
SERVICES
* * *
(d)(1)(A) A health insurance plan that does not otherwise provide for
management of care under the plan, or that does not provide for the same
degree of management of care for all health conditions, may provide coverage
for treatment of mental conditions through a managed care organization,
provided that the managed care organization is in compliance with rules
adopted by the Commissioner that ensure that the system for delivery of
treatment for mental conditions does not diminish or negate the purpose of this
section. In reviewing policy rates and forms pursuant to section 4026 of this
title, the Commissioner or the Green Mountain Care Board established in
18 V.S.A. chapter 220, as appropriate, shall consider the compliance of the
policy with the provisions of this section.
* * *
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 33 of 103
2026
(C) Prior to the adoption of rules pursuant to this subdivision (d)(1),
the Commissioner shall consult with the Commissioner of Mental Health and
the task force established pursuant to subsection (h) of this section concerning:
* * *
(e) To be eligible for coverage under this section, the service shall be
rendered:
* * *
(2) For treatment of substance abuse use disorder, either:
* * *
Sec. 34. 8 V.S.A. § 4082(a)(3)(A) is amended to read:
(A) necessary to develop skills and abilities for the maximum
reduction of physical or mental disability and for restoration of an individual to
the individual’s best functional level, or to ensure that an individual under 21
years of age achieves proper growth and development; and
Sec. 35. 9 V.S.A. § 2287(b) is amended to read:
(b) For the purposes of subdivision 2288(a)(2) and section 2289 of this
title, a person gives a reasonably equivalent value if the person acquires an
interest of the debtor in an asset pursuant to a regularly conducted,
nonconclusive noncollusive foreclosure sale or execution of a power of sale for
the acquisition or disposition of the interest of the debtor upon default under a
mortgage, deed of trust, or security agreement.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 34 of 103
2026
Sec. 36. 9 V.S.A. § 2491 is amended to read:
§ 2491. FINDINGS; LEGISLATIVE INTENT
The General Assembly finds that:
* * *
Sec. 37. 9 V.S.A. § 2494s is amended to read:
§ 2494s. SALE OF PERSONAL PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT
CONTAINING PFAS PROHIBITED SALE OF PERSONAL
PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT CONTAINING PFAS
* * *
Sec. 38. 9A V.S.A. § 1—301(c)(2) is amended to read:
(2) Sections 2A—105 and 2A—106. Applicability of this the Article on
Leases;
Sec. 39. 9A V.S.A. § 5—109(b)(3) is amended to read:
(3) all of the conditions to entitle a person to the relief under the law of
this state State have been met; and
Sec. 40. 9A V.S.A. § 8—110(d) is amended to read:
(d) “Issuer’s jurisdiction” means the jurisdiction under which the issuer of
the security is organized or, if permitted by the law of that jurisdiction, the law
of another jurisdiction specified by the issuer. An issuer organized under the
law of this state State may specify the law of another jurisdiction as the law
governing the matters specified in subdivisions (a)(2) through (5) of this
section.
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 35 of 103
2026
Sec. 41. 9A V.S.A. § 9—316(d) is amended to read:
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a security
interest in goods covered by a certificate of title which is perfected by any
method under the law of another jurisdiction when the goods become covered
by a certificate of title from this state State remains perfected until the security
interest would have become unperfected under the law of the other jurisdiction
had the goods not become so covered.
Sec. 42. 9A V.S.A. § 9—503(a)(4) is amended to read:
(4) subject to subsection (g) of this section, if the debtor is an individual
to whom this state State has issued a driver’s license that has not expired, only
if the financing statement provides the name of the individual which that is
indicated on the driver’s license;
Sec. 43. 9A V.S.A. § 9—503(g) is amended to read:
(g) If this state State has issued to an individual more than one driver’s
license of a kind described in subdivision (a)(4) of this section, the one that
was issued most recently is the one to which subdivision (a)(4) of this section
refers.
Sec. 44. 9A V.S.A. § 9—514(c) is amended to read:
(c) An assignment of record of a security interest in a fixture covered by a
record of a mortgage which that is effective as a financing statement filed as a
fixture filing under subsection 9—502(c) of this title may be made only by an
VT LEG #389227 v.1

No. 91 Page 36 of 103
2026
assignment of record of the mortgage in the manner provided by law of this
state State other than this title.
Sec. 45. 9A V.S.A. § 9—706(a)(2) is amended to read:
(2) the preeffective-date financing statement was filed in an office in
another state or another office in this state State; and
Sec. 46. 9A V.S.A. § 9—707(d) is amended to read:
(d) If the law of this state State governs perfection of a security interest, the
effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement may be continued only
under subsections 9—705(d) and (f) or section 9—706 of this title.
Sec. 47. 9A V.S.A. § 9—807 is amended to read:
§ 9—807. AMENDMENT OF PRE-EFFECTIVE-DATE FINANCING